Hawaii statutes.
§442-7 Application, scheduling,
administration, scoring, and place of examination. The application
requirements and candidate qualifications to take the National Board of
Chiropractic Examiners examinations specified in section 442-6, and the
scheduling, administration, reexamination, scoring, and place of the
examinations required for licensure shall be in accordance with the policies
and requirements of the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners, unless
otherwise determined and modified by the board. The qualifications for
licensure in this State shall be as established in this chapter and chapter
436B and in rules adopted by the board. [L 1955, c 229, pt of §1(d); RL 1955,
§60-7.5; HRS §442-7; am L 1992, c 150, §2; am L 2000, c 10, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next